Alaska, session 34, HB346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 35.30.020 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (b) The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall, when 06 exercising its police power under AS 02.25.020, comply with local planning and 07 zoning ordinances and other regulations that require vegetative or constructed buffers 08 between an airport and adjacent nonindustrial property unless complying with the 09 local ordinance or regulation would create a hazard to aircraft. The Department of 10 Transportation and Public Facilities may only reduce or remove an existing buffer in a 11 designated buffer zone between an airport and adjacent nonindustrial property if the 12 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 13 (1) determines that reduction or removal of the buffer is necessary to 14 eliminate a direct and immediate safety hazard; 01 (2) provides for public notice and an opportunity to comment before 02 reducing or removing the buffer; and 03 (3) implements additional mitigation measures to minimize the adverse 04 effects associated with reducing or removing the buffer, including establishing a new 05 buffer if practicable. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.